Utah statutes.
41-3-601.   Fees.

(1)  To pay for administering and enforcing this chapter, the administrator shall collect fees determined by the commission under Section 63J-1-504 for each of the following:

(a)  new motor vehicle dealer's license;

(b)  used motor vehicle dealer's license;

(c)  new motorcycle, off-highway vehicle, and small trailer dealer;

(d)  used motorcycle, off-highway vehicle, and small trailer dealer;

(e)  motor vehicle salesperson's license;

(f)  motor vehicle salesperson's transfer or reissue fee;

(g)  motor vehicle manufacturer's license;

(h)  motor vehicle transporter's license;

(i)  motor vehicle dismantler's license;

(j)  motor vehicle crusher's license;

(k)  motor vehicle remanufacturer's license;

(l)  body shop's license;

(m)  distributor or factory branch and distributor branch's license;

(n)  representative's license;

(o)  dealer plates;

(p)  dismantler plates;

(q)  manufacturer plates;

(r)  transporter plates;

(s)  damaged plate replacement;

(t)  in-transit permits;

(u)  loaded demonstration permits;

(v)  additional place of business;

(w)  special equipment dealer's license;

(x)  temporary permits; and

(y)  temporary sports event registration certificates.

(2) (a)  To pay for training certified vehicle inspectors and enforcement under Sections 41-1a-1001 through 41-1a-1008, the State Tax Commission shall establish and the administrator shall collect inspection fees determined by the commission under Section 63J-1-504.

(b)  The division shall use fees collected under Subsection (2)(a) as dedicated credits to be used toward the costs of the division.

(3) (a)  At the time of application, the administrator shall collect a fee of $200 for each salvage vehicle buyer license.

(b)  The administrator may retain a portion of the fee under Subsection (3)(a) to offset the administrator's actual costs of administering and enforcing salvage vehicle buyer licenses.

(4)  The division shall use fees collected under Subsections (1)(x) and (y) as dedicated credits to be used toward the costs of the division.

